Illinois, session 104th, HB3520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,000,000,000, or so much of 5that amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the 6Build Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Natural 7Resources for construction and maintenance of State owned, 8leased, and managed recreation sites. 9    Section 5. The amount of $500,000,000, or so much of that 10amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build 11Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity for grants for capital improvements to convention 13centers. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152025.